Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 2. VOTER QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION

CHAPTER 12. VOTER REGISTRAR

SUBCHAPTER A. VOTER REGISTRAR

Sec. 12.001. DESIGNATION OF VOTER REGISTRAR. The county tax assessor-collector is the voter registrar for the county unless the position of county elections administrator is created or the county clerk is designated as the voter registrar.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 12.002. ADMINISTRATION OF OATHS. The registrar may administer and certify an oath under the seal of office if the oath is required in connection with the registrar's responsibilities under this code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 12.003. FEES PROHIBITED. The registrar may not charge a fee for performing a function in connection with voter registration unless expressly authorized to do so by law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 12.004. OFFICE HOURS. (a) The registrar shall conduct voter registration activities at all times during regular office hours.

(b) The registrar may keep the office open for voter registration activities at times other than regular office hours. The registrar shall post notice of the irregular days and hours the office will be open. The notice must remain posted continuously at each entrance to the registrar's office for the period beginning not later than the third day before the day the office is to be open during irregular hours and ending after the last time specified in the notice for the office to be open.

(c) The registrar's office shall remain open for voter registration activities during the hours the polls are required to be open for voting on the date of any general or primary election in which a statewide office appears on the ballot or any other election held in the county on a uniform election date.

(d) If early voting by personal appearance is required to be conducted for extended hours under Section 85.005(c) or for weekend hours under Section 85.006(e), the registrar's office shall remain open for providing voter registration information during the extended hours or weekend hours that the main early voting polling place is open for voting.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 1(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 12.005. BRANCH OFFICES. The registrar may establish one or more branch offices in the county to conduct voter registration activities for the convenience of persons desiring to register. A branch office may be temporary or permanent.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 12.006. REGULAR DEPUTY REGISTRARS. (a) The registrar may appoint one or more deputy registrars to assist in the registration of voters, subject to Subsection (e).

(b) In this code, "regular deputy registrar" means a deputy registrar appointed under this section.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), a regular deputy registrar has the same authority as the registrar, subject to the registrar's supervision.

(d) A regular deputy registrar may not hear or determine a challenge under this title.

(e) To be eligible for appointment as a regular deputy registrar under this section, a person must meet the requirements to be a qualified voter under Section 11.002 except that the person is not required to be a registered voter.

(f) A regular deputy registrar may not assist in the registration of voters until the deputy registrar has completed training developed under Section 13.047. At the time of appointment, the voter registrar shall provide information about the times and places at which training is offered.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (H.B. 1570), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(13), eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. COUNTY CLERK AS VOTER REGISTRAR

Sec. 12.031. DESIGNATION OF COUNTY CLERK AS VOTER REGISTRAR. The commissioners court by written order may designate the county clerk as the voter registrar for the county if the county clerk and county tax assessor-collector agree to the designation.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 12.032. DESIGNATION ORDER. (a) The order designating the county clerk as the voter registrar must state the effective date of the transfer of voter registration duties and functions to the county clerk.

(b) The county clerk shall deliver a certified copy of the order to the secretary of state not later than the third day after the date the order is adopted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 338 (S.B. 893), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 12.033. APPROPRIATION BY COMMISSIONERS COURT. The amount initially appropriated by the commissioners court for the voter registration activities of the county clerk may not be less than the amount last appropriated to the county's voter registrar for the same purpose.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 12.034. RESCISSION OF DESIGNATION ORDER. (a) The commissioners court by written order may rescind the order designating the county clerk as the voter registrar at any time after two years have elapsed from the date the order was adopted, to become effective on a date stated in the order.

(b) Not later than the third day after the date the rescission order is adopted, the county clerk shall deliver a certified copy of the order to the secretary of state.

(c) On the effective date of the rescission, the county tax assessor-collector is the voter registrar for the county unless the position of county elections administrator is created.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 338 (S.B. 893), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.